Oklahoma, session 2025, SB942.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-162 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. As used in this section:
1. “Antisemitism” has the same meaning as provided for by the
International Holocaust Remembrance Alliance Working Definition of
Antisemitism, including its contemporary examples, as it was adopted
on May 26, 2016;
2. “Institution of higher education” means an institution of
higher education within The Oklahoma State System of Higher
Education; and
3. “Public school” shall have the same meaning as provided for
in Section 1-106 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
B. Discrimination on the basis of race, ethnicity, national
origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status against a
student or an employee in an institution of higher education or a
public school in this state shall be prohibited. No person in this
state shall, on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex,
disability, religion, or marital status, be excluded from
participating in, be denied the benefits of, or be subjected to
discrimination under any institution of higher education or public
school program or activity or in any employment conditions or
practices conducted by an institution of higher education or a
public school that receives or benefits from federal or state
financial assistance.
ENR. S. B. NO. 942 Page 2

C. The criteria for admission to a program or course at an
institution of higher education shall not have the effect of
restricting access by persons of a particular race, ethnicity,
national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital status;
provided, this shall not infringe upon the rights of student faith-
based organizations and ethnic solidarity organizations to select
leadership committed to their group’s mission and principles.
D. All institution of higher education and public school
classes shall be available to all students without regard to race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital
status. Provided, however, the provisions of this subsection shall
not prohibit the provision of programs designed to meet the needs of
students with limited proficiency in English, gifted students, or
students with disabilities or programs tailored to students with
specialized talents or skills.
E. Guidance, counseling, and financial assistance services in
institutions of higher education and public schools shall be
available to all students equally and provided in the same manner
regardless of race, ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability,
religion, or marital status.
F. All education programs, activities, and opportunities
offered by institutions of higher education and public schools shall
be made available without discrimination on the basis of race,
ethnicity, national origin, sex, disability, religion, or marital
status.
G. Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit or restrict
the implementation, funding, or administration of any Indian
education programs or services established under federal or state
law.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-163 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Institutions of higher education and public schools shall
integrate the definition of antisemitism provided for in Section 1
of this act into their student, faculty, and employee codes of
ENR. S. B. NO. 942 Page 3

conduct. Prohibited conduct as it specifically relates to
antisemitism shall include harassment and discrimination against
Jews in compliance with Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and
antidiscrimination regulations provided by the United States
Department of Education and the United States Department of Justice.
B. Institutions of higher education and public schools shall
treat harassment of or discrimination against students or employees
or resulting from institutional policies or programs on their
campuses motivated by or including antisemitic intent in an
identical manner to discrimination motivated by race.
C. All institutions of higher education and public schools are
encouraged to:
1. Incorporate antisemitism awareness training for all
students, faculty, administrators, and campus police;
2. Integrate Jewish American heritage curriculum for students
that incorporates Jewish experiences in the United States of America
pre- and post-revolution, pre- and post-World War II and the
Holocaust, and in modern times; and
3. Place reasonable time, place, and manner restrictions on
speech to ensure order and protect the rights of all students.
D. 1. The State Department of Education shall designate a
Title VI coordinator dedicated to monitoring antisemitic
discrimination and harassment in public schools in this state. All
public schools shall electronically report incidents and complaints
of antisemitic discrimination and harassment to the Title VI
coordinator. The Title VI Coordinator shall establish, maintain,
and publicize a formal reporting process whereby students, parents,
staff, and faculty can submit complaints of antisemitic
discrimination and harassment.
2. The Title VI coordinator designated pursuant to paragraph 1
of this subsection shall thoroughly investigate all submitted
complaints. If after a reasonable investigation a Title VI
coordinator determines that a public school has engaged in, allowed,
or not sufficiently prohibited antisemitic discrimination, the State
Department of Education shall provide written notice to the public
ENR. S. B. NO. 942 Page 4

school to address the complaint within thirty (30) days of receiving
the notice.
3. If the Title VI coordinator determines that the public
school has not taken the necessary actions to address the complaint
within thirty (30) days of receiving the notice, the Department
shall report its findings to the United States Department of
Education and the United States Department of Justice by making a
complaint under Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
E. 1. The Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall
designate a Title VI coordinator dedicated to monitoring antisemitic
discrimination and harassment in institutions of higher education in
this state. All institutions of higher education shall
electronically report incidents and complaints of antisemitic
discrimination and harassment to the Title VI coordinator.
2. The Title VI coordinator designated pursuant to paragraph 1
of this subsection shall thoroughly investigate all submitted
complaints. If after a reasonable investigation a Title VI
coordinator determines that an institution of higher education has
engaged in, allowed, or not sufficiently prohibited antisemitic
discrimination, the State Regents shall provide written notice to
the institution of higher education to address the complaint within
thirty (30) days of receiving the notice.
3. If the Title VI coordinator determines that the institution
of higher education has not taken the necessary actions to address
the complaint within thirty (30) days of receiving the notice, the
State Regents shall report their findings to the United States
Department of Education and the United States Department of Justice
by making a complaint under Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of
1964.
F. No later than June 30, 2026, and June 30 each subsequent
year, the Title VI coordinators designated pursuant to paragraph 1
of subsections D and E of this section shall electronically submit
to the Legislature a report on antisemitism in institutions of
higher education and public schools.
G. The Legislature is encouraged to conduct hearings and/or
investigations to assess if institutions are adequately addressing
ENR. S. B. NO. 942 Page 5

antisemitic harassment and discrimination; if not, the Legislature
should consider reducing or eliminating state funding to such
institutions.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 24-164 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Nothing in this act shall be construed to diminish or
infringe upon any right protected under the First Amendment to the
United States Constitution or Section 22 of Article II of the
Oklahoma Constitution.
B. Nothing in this act shall be construed to conflict with
federal or state discrimination laws.
ENR. S. B. NO. 942 Page 6

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 30th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 942 Page 7